South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S71.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-607.  (A) If a person is convicted of an offense as defined in Section 16-3-600, and the offense was committed against a law enforcement officer during the performance of his official duties, then he must be imprisoned up to an additional five years, in addition to the punishment provided for the principal crime. (B) The court may impose this sentence to run consecutively or concurrently. (C) The penalty provided under this section may not be suspended nor probation granted. (D) The additional punishment may not be imposed unless the indictment alleged as a separate count that the offense was committed against a law enforcement officer who was acting at the time of the offense in his official capacity and conviction was had upon this count in the indictment. The penalties prescribed in this section may not be imposed unless the person convicted was, at the same time, indicted and convicted of a crime as defined in Section 16-3-600. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----